Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3127
Additional grounds for disciplinary action.

In addition to the grounds for disciplinary action found in sections 38-178 and 38-179, a credential subject to the Psychology Practice Act may be denied, refused renewal, limited, revoked, or suspended or have other disciplinary measures taken against it in accordance with section 38-196 when the applicant or licensee fails to disclose the information required by section 38-3124.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1061.